Maryland, session 2025, HB0782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment.
Italics indicate opposite chamber/conference co mm i tte e a m en dm en ts*. hb0782*

HOUSE BILL 782
(a) The State Department of Education Maryland Center for School Safety shall
study how best to:
(1) detect deadly weapons on public middle and high school properties; and
(2) have schools rapidly report the detection of a deadly weapon to a law
enforcement agency.
(b) (1) The study required under this section shall include a comprehensive
audit evaluation of the current security infrastructure used in each public school system in
the State.
(2) The audit evaluation shall include an evaluation of meetings with
members of each local school system to assess:
(i) physical and technological security measures currently in use;
and
(ii) any gaps or areas that require improvement within the current
security system.
(3) The Center shall build on information collected as part of regular safety
evaluations and other reports collected under § 7–1510 of the Education Article in
conducting its evaluation.
(4) Information collected as part of an evaluation is not a public record and
shall be protected in the same manner as records covered by § 4–314.1 of the General
Provisions Article.
(c) The study shall, at minimum, include an evaluation of:
(1) any widely accepted available methods not currently used by the public
school systems in the State and the feasibility of using those methods to help fill gaps or
make improvements in the security system identified in the comprehensive audit
evaluation;
(2) how the current security system could best be adapted to achieve better
detection of deadly weapons and quicker reporting to law enforcement agencies when
deadly weapons have been detected;
(3) software that uses artificial intelligence to identify deadly weapons, and
the necessary steps to ensure that the software works effectively, including integration
used for school safety and how it can best be integrated effectively with security cameras
and other currently used safety measures;
(4) an increased use of security cameras in public middle and high schools
and their ideal placement; and

HOUSE BILL 782 3
(5) an increased use of metal detectors, including handheld metal
detectors, in public middle and high school entrances.
(d) The Center shall request any available assessment of technologies evaluated
under this Act that analyzes the technology’s:
(1) efficacy;
(2) bias;
(3) data ownership;
(4) privacy;
(5) scope of use; and
(6) risk management.
(e) (1) On or before December 1, 2025, in a manner that does not jeopardize
school safety, the State Department of Education Maryland Center for School Safety shall
issue an interim report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on
the findings of its study to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House, the Senate
Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment, and the House Ways and Means
Committee.
(2) On or before December 1, 2026, in a manner that does not jeopardize
school safety, the Maryland Center for School Safety shall issue a final report, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the findings of its study to the President
of the Senate, the Speaker of the House, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and
the Environment, and the House Ways and Means Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year 2 years and 1 month and, at the end
of June 30, 2026 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.